Indiana, session 2026, SB110.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 21-20-3-2, AS AMENDED BY P.L.213-2025,
SECTION 253, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 2. (a) The board of trustees has
nine (9) members. appointed by the governor.
(b) At least five (5) of the members appointed to the board of
trustees must be alumni of Indiana University.
SECTION 2. IC 21-20-3-2.5 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE UPON
PASSAGE]. Sec. 2.5. (a) The governor may at any time remove and
replace a member of the board of trustees who was elected by the
alumni of Indiana University.
(b) If the governor removes and replaces a member under this
section, the new member appointed by the governor serves until the
expiration of the term of the replaced member described in subsection
(a).
(c) If the governor does not remove and replace a member under this
section, the member of the board of trustees elected by the alumni of
Indiana University may serve until the member's term expires.
2026 IN 110—LS 6405/DI 110


(d) This section expires January 1, 2028.
SECTION 3. IC 21-20-3-3, AS AMENDED BY P.L.213-2025,
SECTION 255, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 3. (a) At least five (5) of the
members appointed to the board of trustees must be residents of
Indiana.
(b) This subsection section does not apply to the student trustee
appointed to the board of trustees. Not more than: three (3) of the
members of the board of trustees
(1) one (1) of the trustees elected to the board of trustees; and
(2) two (2) of the trustees appointed to the board of trustees;
may reside in the same county.
SECTION 4. IC 21-20-3-3.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 3.5. (a) Three (3) members of the board of
trustees shall be elected by the alumni of Indiana University under
this chapter. In the year in which the term of any member of the
board of trustees elected by the alumni expires, a successor to the
trustee shall be elected by the alumni of Indiana University, to
serve for a term of three (3) years beginning July 1 next succeeding
the election.
(b) When a vacancy occurs in the membership of the board of
trustees who are elected by the alumni, because of death,
resignation, or any other reason, the vacancy shall be filled by
selection by the Indiana University alumni association executive
council for the unexpired term.
SECTION 5. IC 21-20-3-4.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 4.5. The members of the board of trustees
who are elected by the alumni of Indiana University must be
alumni of Indiana University.
SECTION 6. IC 21-20-3-5.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 5.5. The alumni of Indiana University
consist of those persons who have been awarded a degree by the
board of trustees of Indiana University as recommended by the
faculty.
SECTION 7. IC 21-20-3-6.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 6.5. (a) Any one hundred (100) or more
alumni of Indiana University may file with the librarian of Indiana
University on or before April 1 in each year a written nomination
2026 IN 110—LS 6405/DI 110


for a trustee to be elected by the alumni at the next election.
(b) After April 1, but not later than June 1, a list of all
candidates nominated under this section shall be mailed by the
librarian to each alumnus at the alumnus's address.
SECTION 8. IC 21-20-3-7.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 7.5. Beginning in the 2026 calendar year,
the election of members of the board of trustees shall be held at
Indiana University on the secular day immediately preceding July
1. At that time trustees shall be elected to:
(1) serve for a term of three (3) years from July 1 next
succeeding the trustee's election; and
(2) complete any unexpired term or terms.
SECTION 9. IC 21-20-3-8.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 8.5. The university librarian shall conduct
the elections to select the three (3) alumni members of the board of
trustees. All alumni (as described in section 5.5 of this chapter) are
eligible to participate in the election either by electronic or printed
ballot, and each eligible individual may cast only one (1) vote. A
request for a printed ballot must be made in writing to the
university librarian not later than May 1 of an election year. The
university librarian may adopt rules and regulations as necessary
to carry out this section.
SECTION 10. IC 21-20-3-9.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 9.5. The person receiving the
greatest number of votes cast shall be declared the elected trustee.
If two (2) or more persons receive an equal and the greatest
number of votes cast, the librarian shall cast lots to determine
which of the persons shall be declared the elected trustee.
SECTION 11. IC 21-20-3-10.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 10.5. The term of an elected
trustee expires July 1 of the year in which the terms are to end.
SECTION 12. IC 21-20-3-11.5 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE
UPON PASSAGE]. Sec. 11.5. Except for the student trustee described
in section 13 of this chapter, an employee of Indiana University may
not serve as a member of the board of trustees.
SECTION 13. IC 21-20-3-12, AS AMENDED BY P.L.213-2025,
SECTION 265, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 12. (a) Except for a student
2026 IN 110—LS 6405/DI 110


trustee described in section 13 of this chapter, each member The
governor shall appoint five (5) members of the board of trustees
serves for a term terms of three (3) years.
(b) A member of the board of trustees may not serve more than three
(3) terms.
(c) (b) Whenever a vacancy occurs in the membership of the board
of trustees who are appointed by the governor because of death or
resignation or for any other reason, the vacancy shall be filled by an
appointment of the governor for the unexpired term.
SECTION 14. IC 21-20-3-13, AS AMENDED BY P.L.213-2025,
SECTION 266, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 13. (a) One (1) member
appointed The governor shall appoint to the board of trustees a
member who must be a full-time student of Indiana University during
the two (2) year tenure of the appointment.
(b) The student trustee appointed in accordance with this section
serves for a term of one (1) year.
SECTION 15. IC 21-20-3-17 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 17. (a) This section does not
apply to the:
(1) student trustee appointed to the board of trustees under
this chapter; or
(2) other members of the board of trustees whose terms expire
in June 2026.
(b) Notwithstanding any other provision in this chapter, an
election by the alumni of Indiana University shall be held as
described in this chapter to elect three (3) members of the board of
trustees. The following apply to the three (3) members elected as
provided in this section in 2026:
(1) The three (3) elected members replace the members of the
board of trustees who were appointed as new members by the
governor in June 2025.
(2) Each alumnus described in section 5.5 of this chapter may
cast three (3) votes in the 2026 election. However, an alumnus
may not cast more than one (1) vote for the same candidate.
(3) The initial term of each elected member is as follows:
(A) The individual who receives the greatest number of
votes cast shall be declared an elected trustee and serve an
initial term of three (3) years.
(B) The individual who receives the second greatest
number of votes cast shall be declared an elected trustee
2026 IN 110—LS 6405/DI 110


and serve an initial term of two (2) years.
(C) The individual who receives the third greatest number
of votes cast shall be declared an elected trustee and serve
an initial term of one (1) year.
(4) If two (2) or more persons described in subdivision (3)
receive an equal number of votes cast for one (1) elected
trustee position, the librarian shall cast lots to determine
which of the persons shall be declared the elected trustee.
(5) The term of each elected member begins July 1, 2026.
(6) The term of a each elected member expires July 1 of the
year in which the terms are to end.
(c) This section expires July 1, 2030.
SECTION 16. An emergency is declared for this act.
2026 IN 110—LS 6405/DI 110